Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1027
Budget; restrictions.

No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.

Average dailyAllowable membership ofreserve districtpercentage 0 - 47145 471.01 - 3,04435 3,044.01 - 10,00025 10,000.01 and over20

On or before May 1, 2020, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal year.

Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves, total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 83;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 88;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 204;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 175;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3818;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 673;

Laws 1998, Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 31;

Laws 1999, LB 149, § 12;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 26;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 28;

Laws 2002, LB 460, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 67, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 49;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2007, LB21, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB61, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB545, § 18;

Laws 2009, LB548, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB711, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB1071, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB18, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB633, § 4;

Laws 2013, LB408, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB838, § 3;

Laws 2017, LB119, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB430, § 4;

Laws 2020, LB880, § 4.